South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3953.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 75, Title 15 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 15-75-30.  (A) An unemancipated minor may maintain an action for damages from an intentional or tortious violation of the right to the companionship, aid, society, and services of his parent. Provided that such action shall not include any damages recovered prior thereto by the injured parent. (B) A parent or legal guardian of an unemancipated minor child may maintain an action for damages from an intentional or tortious violation of the right to companionship, aid, society, and services of his unemancipated minor.  Provided that such action shall not include any damages recovered prior thereto by the injured unemancipated minor. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----